Florida, session 2026, HB7007.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subsection (7) of section
288.075, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
288.075 Confidentiality of records.—
(7) LOAN PROGRAMS.—
(c) This subsection is subject to the Open Government
Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand
repealed on October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and saved from
repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7007-00